test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex_kuarrud_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - kuárruđ: # MLO checked
    kuárruđ+V+Inf: kuárruđ
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuárum
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kuáruh
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuáru
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: kuárroon
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: kuáruvettee
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: kuárruv
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kuárrup
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kuáruvetteđ
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kuáruh
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: koorrum
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: koorruh
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [kuárui, kuároi]
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: [kuáruim, kuároim]
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: [kuáruid, kuároid]
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: [kuáruin, kuároin]
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [kuáruim, kuároim]
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [kuáruid, kuároid]
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: korruu
    kuárruđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: [kuáruččim, kuároččim]
    kuárruđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: [kuáruččih, kuároččih]
    kuárruđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: [kuáruččij, kuároččij]
    kuárruđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: [kuáruččáim, kuároččáim]
    kuárruđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: [kuáruččáid, kuároččáid]
    kuárruđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: [kuáruččáin, kuároččáin]
    kuárruđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: [kuáruččijm, kuároččijm]
    kuárruđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: [kuáruččijd, kuároččijd]
    kuárruđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: [kuáruččii, kuároččii]
    kuárruđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: kuároom
    kuárruđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: kuárooh
    kuárruđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: kuáruš
    kuárruđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: [kuáružeen, kuárožeen]
    kuárruđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: [kuárušvettee, kuárošvettee]
    kuárruđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: [kuáružává, kuárožává]
    kuárruđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: [kuáružep, kuárožep]
    kuárruđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: [kuárušvetteđ, kuárošvetteđ]
    kuárruđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: [kuáružeh, kuárožeh]

    kuárruđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: [kuáru, kuáro]
    kuárruđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: kuárus
    kuárruđ+V+Imprt+Du1: kuárroon
    kuárruđ+V+Imprt+Du2: kuárroo
    kuárruđ+V+Imprt+Du3: kuárrus
    kuárruđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: kuárrup
    kuárruđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: kuárruđ
    kuárruđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: kuárrus
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: [kuáru, kuáro]
    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: kuárrum
    kuárruđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: [kuáruččii, kuároččii]
    kuárruđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: korruu
    kuárruđ+V+PrsPrc: kuárroo
    kuárruđ+V+PrfPrc: kuárrum
    kuárruđ+V+Actio+Nom: kuárrum
    kuárruđ+V+Actio+Ess: kuárumin
    kuárruđ+V+Actio+Loc: kuárumist
    kuárruđ+V+Actio+Ill: kuárumân
    kuárruđ+V+Actio+Com: [kuárudijn, kuárodijn]
#    kuárruđ+V+VAbess: kuáruhennáá
#    kuárruđ+V+VAbess: kuáruhinnáá
    kuárruđ+V+VAbess: [kuáruhánnáá, kuárohánnáá]

  Verb - nááđđuđ: # MLO checked nááđđ 2SYLL_KUARRUD
    nááđđuđ+V+Inf: nááđđuđ
    nááđđuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: nááđum
    nááđđuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: nááđuh
    nááđđuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: nááđu
    nááđđuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: náđđoon
    nááđđuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: náđuvettee
    nááđđuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: nááđđuv
    nááđđuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: nááđđup
    nááđđuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: náđuvetteđ
    nááđđuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: nááđuh
    nááđđuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: naađđum
    nááđđuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: naađđuh
    nááđđuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [nááđui, náđoi]
    nááđđuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: [nááđuim, náđoim]
    nááđđuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: [nááđuid, náđoid]
    nááđđuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: [nááđuin, náđoin]
    nááđđuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [nááđuim, náđoim]
    nááđđuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [nááđuid, náđoid]
    nááđđuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: nađđuu
    nááđđuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: [náđuččim, náđoččim]
    nááđđuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: [náđuččih, náđoččih]
    nááđđuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: [náđuččij, náđoččij]
    nááđđuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: [náđuččáim, náđoččáim]
    nááđđuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: [náđuččáid, náđoččáid]
    nááđđuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: [náđuččáin, náđoččáin]
    nááđđuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: [náđuččijm, náđoččijm]
    nááđđuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: [náđuččijd, náđoččijd]
    nááđđuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: [náđuččii, náđoččii]
    nááđđuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: nááđoom
    nááđđuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: nááđooh
    nááđđuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: nááđuš
    nááđđuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: [náđužeen, náđožeen]
    nááđđuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: [nááđušvettee, nááđošvettee]
    nááđđuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: [náđužává, náđožává]
    nááđđuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: [náđužep, náđožep]
    nááđđuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: [nááđušvetteđ, náđošvetteđ]
    nááđđuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: [náđužeh, náđožeh]

    nááđđuđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: [nááđu, náđo]
    nááđđuđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: nááđus
    nááđđuđ+V+Imprt+Du1: náđđoon
    nááđđuđ+V+Imprt+Du2: náđđoo
    nááđđuđ+V+Imprt+Du3: nááđđus
    nááđđuđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: nááđđup
    nááđđuđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: nááđđuđ
    nááđđuđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: nááđđus
    nááđđuđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: [nááđu, náđo]
    nááđđuđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: nááđđum
    nááđđuđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: [náđuččii, náđoččii]
    nááđđuđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: nađđuu
    nááđđuđ+V+PrsPrc: náđđoo
    nááđđuđ+V+PrfPrc: nááđđum
    nááđđuđ+V+Actio+Nom: nááđđum
    nááđđuđ+V+Actio+Ess: náđumin
    nááđđuđ+V+Actio+Loc: náđumist
    nááđđuđ+V+Actio+Ill: náđumân
    nááđđuđ+V+Actio+Com: [náđudijn, náđodijn]
#    nááđđuđ+V+VAbess: [náđuhennáá, náđohennáá]
#    nááđđuđ+V+VAbess: [náđuhinnáá, náđohánnáá]
    nááđđuđ+V+VAbess: [náđuhánnáá, náđohánnáá]


  Verb - kááijuđ: # MLO checked
    kááijuđ+V+Inf: kááijuđ
    kááijuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: káájum
    kááijuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kááju # CSH
    kááijuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: káijoon
    kááijuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: kájuvettee # CSH
    kááijuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: káájuh # CSH
    kááijuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kaaijum
    kááijuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: kaaijuh
    kááijuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [káájui, kájoi]
    kááijuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kaijuu


  Verb - čiärruđ: # MLO checked
    čiärruđ+V+Inf: čiärruđ
    čiärruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čiärum
    čiärruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čiäru
    čiärruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: čiärroon
    čiärruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: čiäruvettee
    čiärruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: čiäruh
    čiärruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: čierrum
    čiärruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: čierruh
    čiärruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [čiärui, čiäroi]
    čiärruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: čierruu


  Verb - miälluđ: # MLO checked
    miälluđ+V+Inf: miälluđ
    miälluđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: miälum
    miälluđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: miälu
    miälluđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: miälloon
    miälluđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: miäluvettee
    miälluđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: miäluh
    miälluđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: meellum
    miälluđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: meelluh
    miälluđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [miälui, miäloi]
    miälluđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: melluu


#  Verb - kuárruđ: # MLO checked
#    kuárruđ+V+Inf: kuárruđ
#    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kuárum
#    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kuáruh
#    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kuáru
#    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: kuárroon
#    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: kuáruvettee
#    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: kuárruv
#    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kuárrup
#    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kuáruvetteđ
#    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kuáruh
#    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: koorrum
#    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: koorruh
#    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [kuárui, kuároi]
#    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: [kuáruim, kuároim]
#    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: [kuáruid, kuároid]
#    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: [kuáruin, kuároin]
#    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [kuáruim, kuároim]
#    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [kuáruid, kuároid]
#    kuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: korruu


  Verb - stuárruđ: # MLO checked
    stuárruđ+V+Inf: stuárruđ
    stuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: stuárum
    stuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: stuáruh
    stuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: stuáru
    stuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: stuárroon
    stuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: stuáruvettee
    stuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: stuárruv
    stuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: stuárrup
    stuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: stuáruvetteđ
    stuárruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: stuáruh
    stuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: stuorrum
    stuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: stuorruh
    stuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [stuárui, stuároi]
    stuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: [stuáruim, stuároim]
    stuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: [stuáruid, stuároid]
    stuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: [stuáruin, stuároin]
    stuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [stuáruim, stuároim]
    stuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [stuáruid, stuároid]
    stuárruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: stuorruu

  Verb - vuáijuđ: # MLO checked
    vuáijuđ+V+Inf: vuáijuđ
    vuáijuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuájum
    vuáijuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: vuájuh
    vuáijuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuáju # CSH
    vuáijuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: vuáijoon
    vuáijuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: vuájuvettee
    vuáijuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: vuáijuv
    vuáijuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: vuáijup
    vuáijuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: vuájuvetteđ
    vuáijuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vuájuh
    vuáijuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vuoijum
    vuáijuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: vuoijuh
    vuáijuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [vuájui, vuájoi]
    vuáijuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: [vuájuim, vuájoim]
    vuáijuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: [vuájuid, vuájoid]
    vuáijuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: [vuájuin, vuájoin]
    vuáijuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [vuájuim, vuájoim]
    vuáijuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [vuájuid, vuájoid]
    vuáijuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: vuoijuu
